Missouri, session 2026, SB1134.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 197, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 197.708, to read as
follows:
197.708. 1. As used in this section, the term "health
care facility" means any facility as defined in section
376.1350, including any hospital as defined in section
197.020.
2. Each health care facility shall display in a
prominent place within the health care facility a printed
sign with the following text in all capital letters:
"WARNING: ASSAULTING A HEALTH CARE PROFESSIONAL WHO IS
ENGAGED IN THE PERFORMANCE OF HIS OR HER OFFICIAL DUTIES,
INCLUDING STRIKING A HEALTH CARE PROFESSIONAL WITH ANY
BODILY FLUID, IS A SERIOUS CRIME THAT MAY BE PUNISHABLE AS A
CLASS A MISDEMEANOR.".
✓